California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) If a specific date is not established by contract, the date upon which an invoice is received, if the invoice specifies payment is due upon receipt.

(3) If a specific date is not established by contract or invoice, 60 days after receipt of a proper invoice for the amount of the payment due.

(d) The penalty assessed under this section shall not be paid from the Bronzan-McCorquodale program funds or county matching funds. The penalty provisions of this section shall not apply to the late payment of any federal funds or Medi-Cal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 374.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5664.

(a) In consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the State Department of Health Care Services, the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, and the California Health and Human Services Agency, county behavioral health systems shall provide reports and data to meet the information needs of the state, as necessary.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 30) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 31.   (SB 326)   Effective October 12, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5665.

After the development of performance outcome measures pursuant to Section 5610, whenever a county makes a substantial change in its allocation of mental health funds among services, facilities, programs, and providers, it shall, at a regularly scheduled public hearing of the board of supervisors, document that it based its decision on the most cost-effective use of available resources to maximize overall client outcomes, and provide this documentation to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 131.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5667.

(a) A community mental health center shall be considered to be a licensed facility for all purposes, including all provisions of the Health and Safety Code and the Insurance Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “community mental health center” means any entity that is one of the following:

(1) A city or county mental health program.

(2) A facility funded under the federal Community Mental Health Centers Act, contained in Subchapter 3 (commencing with Section 2681) of Chapter 33 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) A nonprofit agency that has a contract with a county mental health program to provide both of the following:

(A) A comprehensive program of mental health services in an outpatient setting designed to improve the function of persons with diagnosed mental health problems pursuant to procedures governing all aspects of the program formulated with the aid of multidisciplinary staff, including physicians and surgeons, all of whom serve on quality assurance and utilization review committees.

(B) Diagnostic and therapeutic services for individuals with diagnosed mental health problems, together with related counseling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 712, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Program Initiatives [5670. - 5698.]



  ARTICLE 1. Community Residential Treatment System [5670. - 5676.5.]

5670.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the development of a system of residential treatment programs in every county which provides a range of alternatives to institutional care based on principles of residential, community-based treatment. 

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that community residential mental health programs in the State of California be developed in accordance with the guidelines and principles set forth in this chapter. To this end, counties may implement the community residential treatment system described in this chapter either with available county allocations, or as new moneys become available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 134.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5670.5.

Criteria for community residential treatment system programs are as follows:

(a) Facilities: 

(1) Settings, whether residential or day, should be as close to a normal home environment as possible without sacrificing client safety or care. 

(2) Residential treatment centers should be relatively small, preferably 15 beds or less, but in any case with the appearance of a noninstitutional setting. 

(3) The individual elements of the system should, where possible, be in separate facilities, and not part of one large facility attempting to serve an entire range of clients. 

(b) Staffing patterns: 

(1) Staffing patterns should reflect, to the maximum extent feasible, at all levels, the cultural, linguistic, ethnic, sexual and other social characteristics of the community the facility serves. 

(2) The programs should be designed to use appropriate multidisciplinary professional consultation and staff to meet the specific diagnostic and treatment needs of the clients. 

(3) The programs should use paraprofessionals and persons who have been consumers of mental health services where appropriate. 

(c) Programs: 

(1) The programs should, to the maximum extent feasible, be designed so as to reduce the dependence on medications as a sole treatment tool. Programs in which prescriptions for medication are a component of the program should be subject to the medications-monitoring. 

(2) The programs should have a rehabilitation focus which encourages the client to develop the skills to become self-sufficient and capable of increasing levels of independent functioning. Where appropriate, they should include prevocational and vocational programs. 

(3) The program should encourage the participation of the clients in the daily operation of the setting in development of treatment and rehabilitation planning and evaluation. 

(4) Participation in any element of the system should not preclude the involvement of clients in individual therapy. Individual therapists of clients should, where possible, be directly involved in the development and implementation of a treatment plan, including medication and day program decisions. 

(d) Coordination: 

The programs should demonstrate specific linkages with one another, and with the general treatment and social service system, as a whole. These connections should not be limited to the mental health system, but should include, whenever possible, community resources utilized by the general population.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 134.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5671.

The following should be the programs in the community residential treatment system. These programs should be designed to provide, at every level, alternatives to institutional settings.

(a) A program for a short-term crisis residential alternative to hospitalization for individuals experiencing an acute episode or crisis requiring temporary removal from their home environment. The program should be available for admissions 24 hours a day, seven days a week. The primary focus of this program should be on reduction of the crisis, on stabilization, and on a diagnostic assessment of the person’s existing support system, including recommendations for referrals upon discharge. 

The services in the program should include, but not be limited to, provision for direct family work, connections to prevocational and vocational programs, and development of a support system, including income and treatment referrals. This program should be designed for persons who would otherwise be referred to an inpatient unit, either locally or in the state hospital. This program should place an emphasis on stabilization and appropriate referral for further treatment or support services, or both. 

(b) A long-term residential treatment program, with a full day treatment component as a part of the program, for persons who may require intensive support for as long as two or three years. This program should be designed to provide a rehabilitation program for the so-called “chronic” patient who needs long-term support in order to develop independent living skills. The clients in this program should be those who would otherwise be living marginally in the community with little or no service support, and who would return many times to the hospital for treatment. It should also serve those who are referred to, and maintained in, state hospitals or nursing homes because they require long-term, intensive support. This program should go beyond maintenance to provide an active rehabilitation focus for these individuals. 

The services in this program should include, but not be limited to, intensive diagnostic work, including learning disability assessment, full day treatment program with an active prevocational and vocational component, special education services, outreach to develop linkages with the general social service system, and counseling to aid clients in developing the skills to move toward a less structured setting. 

(c) A transitional residential program designed for persons who are able to take part in programs in the general community, but who, without the support of counseling, as well as the therapeutic community, would be at risk of returning to the hospital. This program may employ a variety of staffing patterns and should be for persons who may be expected to move toward a more independent living setting within approximately three months to one year. The clients should be expected to play a major role in the functioning of the household, and shall be encouraged to accept increasing levels of responsibility, both in the residential community, and in the community as a whole. Residents should be required to be involved in daytime activities outside of the house which are relevant to their personal goals and conducive to their achieving more self-sufficiency. 

The services in this program should include, but are not limited to, counseling and ongoing assessment, development of support systems in the community, a day program which encourages interaction between clients and the community-at-large, and an activity program that encourages socialization and utilization of general community resources. 

(d) A program for semisupervised, independent, but structured living arrangement for persons who do not need the intensive support of the other system programs, but who, without some support and structure, are at risk to return to a condition requiring hospitalization. The individual apartments or houses should be shared by three to five persons. These small cooperative housing units should function as independent households with direct linkages to staff support in case of emergencies, as well as for regular assessment and evaluation meetings. Individuals may use satellite housing as a transition to independent living, or may remain in this setting indefinitely in order to avoid the need for more intensive settings. 

This program should be for persons who only need minimum support in order to live in the community. These individuals may require rent subsidy, as well as the backup of another system, in order to remain in this setting. The satellite units should be as normative as the general living arrangements in the communities in which they are developed. 

(e) A program to provide emergency housing or respite care services, or both. These services should be designed for persons with a mental disability in need of temporary housing, but who do not require hospitalization or the more intensive support and treatment of the crisis residential program. Services provided should include, but not be limited to, advocacy, counseling, and linkages to community mental health and other human services, including referrals to vocational and housing opportunities. 

(f) A day rehabilitation program which should be designed to provide structured education, training, and support services to promote the development of independent living skills and community support. Services provided should include, but not be limited to, peer support, education services, prevocational and employment services, recreational and social activities, service brokerage and advocacy, orientation to community resources, training in independent living skills, health education including medication education, individual and group counseling, education and counseling services for family members, and crisis intervention. 

(g) The program for socialization centers should be designed to serve a broad range of clients, including those in the system programs, when appropriate, as well as persons living in the community in general. This program should be designed to provide regular daytime, evening, and weekend activities for persons who require long-term, structured support, but who do not receive such services in their living setting. Although the socialization center is meant to provide a maintenance support program for those individuals who only wish or require regular socialization opportunities, the programs should also provide the opportunity to develop the skills to move toward more independent functioning. 

The services in this program should include, but not be limited to, outings, recreational activities, cultural events, linkages to community resources, as well as prevocational counseling, life skills training, and other rehabilitation efforts. This program should be for persons who would lose contact with a social or treatment system, or both, if left to their isolated living situation, or their ability to participate in activities for the “general public.” With this level of support, persons would be able to lead full and active lives, with the opportunity to develop the skills to move toward independent living. Also included in the program should be adult education support programs which utilize community college and other adult education agencies. These services would provide opportunities to individuals throughout the community residential treatment system and in other living settings, including independent living, to develop skills necessary for independent living through the utilization of resources available to the general population. 

(h) An in-home treatment program designed as an alternative to out-of-home placement for individuals who are otherwise not appropriate for, or do not choose to participate in, other elements of the community residential treatment system. This program should be designed for those individuals who would benefit most from a treatment intervention in their home environment. It is a basic premise of this element that treatment should focus on the development of family and other personal and community supports, rather than exclusively on the individual. The goal of the program should be to reintegrate the individual with the family unit, when appropriate, and with the greater community without removing the person from his or her home environment. 

The service may be designed as a crisis intervention for persons experiencing an acute episode or an ongoing independent living service, or both, for persons wishing to obtain or maintain housing and services in the community. Services provided should include, but not be limited to, crisis intervention, family work, when appropriate, development of a specific treatment plan, development of an ongoing rehabilitation plan utilizing available resources in the community, and coordination with such services as case management, vocational rehabilitation, schools and other education services, and various special programs which would act as a support system for the individual. 

(i) A volunteer-based companion program designed to encourage the development of personal relationships with residents of community care facilities with the goal of motivating and assisting residents to make a successful transition to independent living, or to programs of the community residential treatment system. 

The service should be provided primarily by volunteers, including students as a part of a college or university curriculum, who are supervised and coordinated by trained and experienced personnel. Services provided should include, but not be limited to, recreation, one-to-one companionship, advocacy, and assistance in developing the knowledge and use of community resources, including housing and vocational services, and follow up for persons who make the transition to independent living.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 134.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5671.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that programs serving children and adolescents should be established under this chapter. Such programs should follow the guidelines and principles set forth in this chapter and in addition should meet the following criteria unique to the population to be served:

(a) The programs should, to the maximum extent feasible, be designed so as to reduce the disruption and promote the reintegration of the family unit of which the child is a part. 

(b) The programs should have an education focus and should demonstrate specific linkage with community education resources. 

(c) The programs should contain a specific followup component.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 134.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5672.

The types of programs serving children and adolescents referred to in Section 5671.5 are those described in this section. The programs should meet the criteria set forth in this section and in Sections 5671 and 5671.5. Nothing in this section should be construed to waive any licensure requirement pursuant to the California Community Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) for any community care facility.

(a) A program for a short-term crisis residential alternative to hospitalization. The services in this program should include, but not be limited to, provision of direct services to the family, specific linkages with the child’s educational system and community educational resources, and development of a support system, including school and treatment referrals. The program should be designed for children and adolescents who would otherwise be referred to a psychiatric inpatient unit. It should be a 24-hour program, with an emphasis on stabilization and appropriate referral for further treatment or support services.

(b) A long-term residential treatment program. This program should have an educational orientation and should reflect the principle that education be available in the least restrictive environment. The program should serve children and adolescents requiring an intensive support system for a period of six to 18 months, who would otherwise be at risk of periodic hospitalization. The program should provide coordinated intervention with the child, family unit, and community education resources, and should include aftercare services to the child and family unit to solidify gains and develop skills in linking with community services. 

(c) A transitional residential program. This program may include group homes, foster homes, or homes adapted for preparing adolescents approaching majority to adjust to emancipation. 

The services in this program should include, but not be limited to, coordination with community education resources to meet the child’s individual need, family services designed to strengthen the family unity of which the child is a part, and aftercare services to reinforce the gains brought about by the program and assist in community adjustment. 

(d) A program for a semisupervised, independent but structured living arrangement. This program should apply to older adolescents, who are either emancipated or who would not be returning home from out-of-home placement. The semisupervised living arrangement should require structured living designed to impart those skills necessary for successful independent living as described in subdivision (d) of Section 5671. Adult supervision should be available 24 hours per day. 

The services should include, but not be limited to, prevocational and vocational linkages in the community, financial planning which may include rent subsidy assistance, and development of a social support system. 

(e) (1) A day treatment program. This program should provide services to children and adolescents who are residing in their own homes or in out-of-home placements. Schoolsites or other noninstitutional settings are preferred for this program. A day treatment program for children should offer a multidisciplinary approach and should incorporate education, recreation, and rehabilitation activities. Services provided should be age appropriate and age specific intensive remedial programs, including education, counseling, socialization, and recreational services. To the extent feasible, the client’s family should be included in these activities.

(2) Day treatment services should be designed to provide an alternative to residential placement, to provide preventive services in the early stages of family breakdown, and to reduce the need for more costly and lengthy treatment services. Aftercare services should be available to maintain gains and prevent family regression. 

(f) A socialization center program. This program should provide a multidisciplinary approach and seek funding from a variety of agencies responsible for providing services, including, but not limited to, school districts and recreation departments. The services should promote community acceptance of clients and the integration of their family units. Family involvement in planning activities and developing support system linkages should be encouraged. 

(g) An in-home treatment program. This program should be designed to strengthen the child’s ties with the family unit and with the greater community without removing the child from his or her home environment and community educational system. 

Services provided should include, but not be limited to, crisis intervention, direct family services, development of specific treatment plans, development of ongoing plans utilizing available resources in the community educational system, and special programs which act as a support system for the child and family unit. 

(h) Augmentation of crisis intervention program. This program should provide specifically for evaluation, diagnosis, and disposition planning for children and adolescents in psychiatric crisis. 

(i) Case management services program. This program should emphasize prevention services and should be designed to divert to noninstitutional programs children and adolescents at risk of involvement with traditional mental health institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 47.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5675.

(a) (1) Mental health rehabilitation centers shall only be licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services subsequent to application by counties, county contract providers, or other organizations.

(2) In the application for a mental health rehabilitation center, program evaluation measures shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) That the clients placed in the facilities show improved global assessment scores as measured by preadmission and postadmission tests.

(B) That the clients placed in the facilities
 demonstrate improved functional behavior as measured by preadmission and
 postadmission tests.

(C) That the clients placed in the facilities have reduced medication levels as determined by comparison of preadmission and postadmission records.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall conduct annual licensing inspections of mental health rehabilitation centers.

(c) (1) All regulations relating to the licensing of mental health rehabilitation centers, heretofore adopted by the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable by the State Department of Health Care Services with respect to any facility or program required to be licensed as a mental health rehabilitation center, unless and until readopted,
 amended, or repealed by the Director of Health Care Services.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services shall succeed to and be vested with all duties, powers, purposes, functions, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the State Department of Mental Health, and its successor, if any, as they relate to licensing mental health rehabilitation centers. The State Department of Health Care Services may adopt, amend, or repeal regulations regarding the licensing of mental health rehabilitation centers.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), pursuant to Section 5963.05, the State Department of Health Care Services may develop and revise documentation standards for individual service plans to be consistent with the standards developed pursuant to paragraph
 (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 14184.402.

(2) The department shall require mental health rehabilitation centers to implement these documentation standards and shall conduct annual licensing inspections and investigations to determine compliance with these standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 644, Sec. 8.   (SB 1238)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5675.05.

(a) A mental health rehabilitation center may admit clients diagnosed only with a severe substance use disorder, as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 5008, under the following conditions:

(1) The mental health rehabilitation center obtains and maintains at least one level of care designation from the State Department of Health Care Services or at least one level of care certification from the American Society of Addiction Medicine consistent with all program services it offers for the treatment of severe substance use disorder.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services approves the mental
 health rehabilitation center’s policies and procedures for providing substance use disorder services.

(3) The mental health rehabilitation center admits these clients involuntarily pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000).

(4) The mental health rehabilitation center either offers medications for addiction treatment (MAT) or has an effective referral process in place with narcotic treatment programs, community health centers, or other MAT providers. An effective referral process shall include an established relationship with a MAT provider and transportation to appointments for MAT.

(5) The mental health rehabilitation center implements and maintains a MAT policy approved by the State Department of Health Care
 Services. The MAT policy shall do all of the following:

(A) Explain how a client receives information about the benefits and risks of MAT.

(B) Describe the availability of MAT at the program, if applicable, or the referral process for MAT.

(C) Identify an evidence-based assessment for determining a client’s MAT needs.

(D) Address administration, storage, and disposal of MAT, if applicable.

(E) Outline training for staff about the benefits and risks of MAT.

(F) Outline training for staff on the MAT policy.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, until the time regulations are adopted no later than December 31, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 644, Sec. 9.   (SB 1238)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5675.1.

(a) In accordance with subdivision (b), the State Department of Health Care Services may establish a system for the imposition of prompt and effective civil sanctions for long-term care facilities licensed or certified by the department, including facilities licensed under the provisions of Sections 5675 and 5768, and including facilities certified as providing a special treatment program under Sections 72443 to 72475, inclusive, of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) If the department determines that there is or has been a failure, in a substantial manner, on the part of any such facility to comply with the applicable laws and regulations, the director may impose the following sanctions:

(1) A plan of corrective action that addresses all failure identified by the department and includes timelines for correction.

(2) A facility that is issued a plan of corrective action, and that fails to comply with the plan and repeats the deficiency, may be subject to immediate suspension of its license or certification, until the deficiency is corrected, when failure to comply with the plan of correction may cause a health or safety risk to residents.

(c) The department may also establish procedures for the appeal of an administrative action taken pursuant to this section, including a plan of corrective action or a suspension of license or certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 44.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5675.2.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Mental Health Facility Licensing Fund, from which money, upon appropriation by the Legislature in the Budget Act, shall be expended by the State Department of Health Care Services to fund administrative and other activities in support of the mental health licensing and certification functions of the State Department of Health Care Services. The Mental Health Facility Licensing Fund is the successor to the Licensing and Certification Fund, Mental Health, which fund is hereby abolished. All references in any law to the Licensing and Certification Fund, Mental Health shall be deemed to refer to the Mental Health Facility Licensing Fund.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2005, each
 new and renewal application for a license to operate a mental health rehabilitation center shall be accompanied by an application or renewal fee.

(c) The amount of the fees shall be determined and collected by the State Department of Health Care Services, but the total amount of the fees collected shall not exceed the actual costs of licensure and regulation of the centers, including, but not limited to, the costs of processing the application, inspection costs, and other related costs.

(d) Each license or renewal issued pursuant to this chapter shall expire 12 months from the date of issuance. Application for renewal of the license shall be accompanied by the necessary fee and shall be filed with the department at least 30 days prior to the expiration date. Failure to file a timely renewal may result in expiration of the license.

(e) License and renewal fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mental Health Facility Licensing Fund.

(f) Fees collected by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to this section shall be expended by the State Department of Health Care Services for the purpose of ensuring the health and safety of all individuals providing care and supervision by licensees and to support activities of the department, including, but not limited to, monitoring facilities for compliance with applicable laws and regulations.

(g) The State Department of Health Care Services may make additional charges to the facilities if additional visits are required to ensure that corrective action is taken by the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 45.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5676.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services, in conjunction with the State Department of Public Health, shall develop a state-level plan for a streamlined and consolidated evaluation and monitoring program for the review of skilled nursing facilities with special treatment programs. The plan shall provide for consolidated reviews, reports, and penalties for these facilities. The
 plan shall include the cost of, and a timeline for implementing, the plan. The plan shall be developed in consultation with stakeholders, including county mental health programs, consumers, family members of persons residing in long-term care facilities who have serious mental illness, and long-term care providers. The plan shall review resident safety and quality programming, ensure that long-term care facilities engaged primarily in diagnosis, treatment, and care of persons with mental diseases are available and appropriately evaluated, and ensure that strong linkages are built to local communities and other treatment resources for residents and their families. The plan shall be submitted to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2001.

(b) The State Department of Public Health
 shall forward to the State Department of
 Health Care Services copies of citations issued to a skilled nursing facility that has a special treatment program certified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 135.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5676.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that funds allocated to establish or enhance mental health programs are used to integrate the new or enhanced program into an existing system of care.

(b) Counties that apply for funds to establish or enhance their mental health service system shall document, in the application process, how the new funds blend into an existing system of care and do not supplant existing expenditures.

(c) Applications shall include plans for services and supports, and shall specify how the new or enhanced program blends into an existing array of services. Applications shall demonstrate how a collaborative process involving clients, family members, and other system stakeholders was used to develop the proposal.

(d) Applications shall include a commitment to outcome reporting, as defined by the department, including client benefit outcomes, client and family member satisfaction, system of care access, cost savings, cost avoidance, and cost effectiveness outcomes that measure both short- and long-term cost savings.

(e) Applications shall demonstrate, when appropriate, how the county intends to continue the new or enhanced program when the grant funds have ended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 57.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Community Support System for Persons Who are Homeless with a Mental Health Disability [5680. - 5688.6.]

5680.

To assist persons who are homeless with a mental health disability to secure, stabilize, and maintain safe and adequate living arrangements in the community, the Legislature hereby establishes the Community Support System for
 Persons who are Homeless with a Mental Health Disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 23.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5681.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, when funds are made available, counties should ensure the delivery of long-range services and community support assistance to persons who are homeless with a mental health disability and those at risk of becoming homeless.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that specific outreach and service priority be given under this chapter to persons who are homeless with a mental health disability not served by a local or
 state program as of September 30, 1985.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 24.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5682.

The goal of the community support system is to ensure that needed community services are provided to persons who are homeless with a mental health disability and those at risk of becoming homeless to stabilize, maintain, and enhance their living in the community. All services of the community support system are offered to these persons on a voluntary basis. The active participation of the clients being provided services is encouraged at all times. Programs are designed to be accessible to the clients intended to be served. No individual service
 offered should be contingent upon the acceptance of any other community support service or mental health treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 25.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5683.

The function of the community support system is to conduct active outreach to persons who are homeless with a mental health disability, to secure and maintain income, housing, food, and clothing for clients, and to develop social skills and prevocational and vocational skills on a voluntary basis. Each community support system is based upon the range of services as may be necessary to meet a client’s needs:

(a) Personal assistance to secure and maintain housing, food, clothing, income, and health benefits.

(b) Accessing social and vocational skill development activities when they are available, case
 management, and crisis intervention, with a focus on finding alternatives to acute inpatient hospital care, services when they are needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 26.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5683.5.

Community support systems may provide temporary funds to their homeless clients for their personal incidental living needs while the clients are in residential placement. Up to seventy-five dollars ($75) may be made available monthly to each client for this purpose. Local mental health programs shall, to the extent possible, recoup payments from clients after they become eligible for a governmental assistance program, including, but not limited to, general relief or SSI/SSP funds or otherwise become financially able to repay the county community support system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 49.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5685.

Counties may provide specific services, contract with a public or private agency, or a combination of both. Nothing contained in this article shall prevent a county from developing a consortium model which involves a number of providers performing specific functions. If a county decides to contract out a portion or all of the community support program functions, priority shall be given to providers, public or private, that have demonstrated an ability and desire to the county to work with the population intended to be served and which possess the management skills needed to perform the functions they propose to
 perform.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 49.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5685.5.
